District of Columbia statutes.
31-3932.13

Discount on reserves; report on reserves.

(a)

An SPFC may discount its reserves at discount rates as approved by the Commissioner.

(b)

An SPFC shall file annually an actuarial opinion on reserves provided by an approved independent actuary.

History

Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-262, § 213
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-285, § 2(b), 54 DCR 944